Wisconsin, session 2025, AB379.
do enact as follows:AB379,13Section 1. 5.02 (6m) (a) 5. of the statutes is created to read:AB379,2,315.02 (6m) (a) 5. An operator’s license or identification card issued by any 2state, as defined in P.L. 109-13, section 201 (5), that satisfies the requirements of 3P.L. 109-13, section 202.AB379,2,44